Hawaii statutes.
[§206E-183] Findings and determination for
special facility leases. The authority shall not enter into any special
facility lease unless the authority at or prior to the entering into of such
special facility lease shall find and determine that the entering into of such
special facility lease would not be in violation of or result in a breach of
any covenant contained in any resolution or certificate authorizing any bonds
of the authority then outstanding. [L 2001, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next